Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.085

Out-of-state child custody jurisdictional issues.

Jurisdictional issues regarding out-of-state proceedings involving the custody or residential placement of any child of the parties are governed by the uniform child custody jurisdiction and enforcement act, chapter 26.27 RCW.

[ 2021 c 215 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.